src/morphology/stems/punctuation.lexc
LEXICON Punctuation 
¶+CLB:¶   # ;
%,+CLB:%,   # ;
%.+CLB:%.   # ;
%:+CLB:%:   # ;
%;+CLB:%;	  # ;
%!+CLB:%!	  # ;
%?+CLB:%?	  # ;
%-+PUNCT:%-  # ;
%"+HYPH:%" # ;
%«+HYPH:%« # ;
%»+HYPH:%» # ;
%[+PAR:%[ # ;
%]+PAR:%] # ;
%(+PAR:%( # ;
%)+PAR:%) # ;
